Ohio, session 136, HB1018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.64 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.64. The twenty-fifth day of September is designated as "Dolly Parton Imagination Library Reading Day" to recognize Dolly Parton's contributions to childhood literacy and encourage parents, guardians, caregivers, family members, and other adults to read with children and foster a lifelong love of reading in Ohio.